Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB905.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 42ADDICTION TREATMENT SERVICES INFORMATIONCOLLECTION AND REPORTINGSec.4201. Scope of chapter.4202. Definitions.4203. Reporting by insurer.4204. Collection of information and report by department.4205. Subsequent review and report.4206. Identifying information.4207. Regulations.12345678910111213141516171819 4208. Expenses.§ 4201. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the collection and reporting of statistics regarding addiction treatment services provided under health plans and insurance policies, contracts and certificates and compliance with other laws.§ 4202. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Addiction treatment." Treatment provided in or by a facility licensed by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs."Adverse benefit determination." As follows:(1) A denial, reduction or termination of, or a failure to provide or make payment in whole or in part for, a benefit.(2) The term includes any of the following:(i) A denial, reduction, termination or failure to provide or make payment that is based on a determination of a participant's or beneficiary's eligibility to participate in a plan.(ii) With respect to group health plans, a denial, reduction or termination of, or a failure to provide or make payment in whole or in part for, a benefit resulting from the application of any utilization review.(iii) A failure to cover an item or service for which benefits are otherwise provided because it is determined to be experimental or investigational or not medically necessary or appropriate.20250SB0905PN1023 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 " Insurer. " As follows: (1) An entity that issues or administers health insurance policies or health plans and is subject to the jurisdiction of the department.(2) The term includes an entity organized or existing under, or subject to, any of the following:(i) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(iii) The act of May 18, 1976 (P.L.123, No.54), known as the Individual Accident and Sickness Insurance Minimum Standards Act.(iv) Chapter 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."MHPAEA." The Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-343, 122 Stat. 3765)."Review." A utilization review, authorization, preauthorization, concurrent review, retrospective review or audit with respect to a benefit and any other process that results or could result in an adverse benefit determination.§ 4203. Reporting by insurer.On or before April 30 of each year, an insurer shall provide a report containing the following information to the department for the preceding calendar year:(1) The total number of the insurer's insureds and plan members.20250SB0905PN1023 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The total number of the insurer's insureds and plan members who received addiction treatment covered or authorized by the insurer and by any subcontractor acting on behalf of the insurer.(3) For each product line, the units of addiction treatment authorized by the insurer and its subcontractors, broken down by treatment setting, including inpatient hospital detoxification, inpatient hospital rehabilitation, inpatient nonhospital detoxification, inpatient nonhospital residential, partial hospitalization and outpatient.(4) For each product line, the units of addiction treatment reimbursed or otherwise paid for by the insurer and its subcontractors, broken down by treatment setting, including inpatient hospital detoxification, inpatient hospital rehabilitation, inpatient nonhospital detoxification, inpatient nonhospital residential, partial hospitalization and outpatient.(5) For each product line, the average length of stay or units of service for each treatment setting, including inpatient hospital detoxification, inpatient hospital rehabilitation, inpatient nonhospital detoxification, inpatient nonhospital residential, partial hospitalization and outpatient.(6) For each product line, the number and percentage of reviews conducted by the insurer and its subcontractors, the number and percentage of reviews conducted by the insurer and its subcontractors that resulted in denials and the number and percentage of reviews conducted by the insurer and its subcontractors that resulted in other adverse benefit determinations, other than denials, for each of the 20250SB0905PN1023 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following:(i) Inpatient hospital detoxification for alcohol and drug addiction.(ii) Inpatient hospital rehabilitation for alcohol and drug addiction.(iii) Inpatient nonhospital detoxification for alcohol and drug addiction.(iv) Inpatient nonhospital residential for alcohol and drug addiction.(v) Partial hospitalization for alcohol and drug addiction.(vi) Outpatient services for alcohol and drug addiction.(vii) Medical or surgical services.§ 4204. Collection of information and report by department.The information and report under section 4203 (relating to reporting by insurer) shall be:(1) Made available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(2) Provided to the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs for the purposes under section 4205 (relating to subsequent review and report).§ 4205. Subsequent review and report.(a) Review.--The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs, working in consultation with the department, shall review the annual report under section 4203 (relating to reporting by insurer) to determine general compliance by insurers regarding:(1) MHPAEA and Federal guidelines or regulations issued under MHPAEA, including the following, together with any subsequent regulations and interim final rules implementing 20250SB0905PN1023 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MHPAEA:(i) 26 CFR 54.9812-1 (relating to parity in mental health and substance use disorder benefits).(ii) 29 CFR 2590.712 (relating to parity in mental health and substance use disorder benefits).(iii) 42 CFR 438.910 (relating to parity requirements for financial requirements and treatment limitations).(iv) 42 CFR 457.496 (relating to parity in mental health and substance use disorder benefits).(v) 45 CFR 146.136 (relating to parity in mental health and substance use disorder benefits).(2) Section 604-B of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(b) Report.--After review under subsection (a), the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall submit a report of findings to:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) Dissemination of report.--The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall make the report under subsection (b) available on its publicly accessible Internet website.§ 4206. Identifying information.(a) Duty of insurer.--An insurer shall take all necessary steps to ensure that no identifying information regarding a specific insured or plan member is made available to the department, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or the public when carrying out the reporting obligations of this 20250SB0905PN1023 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chapter.(b) Duty of departments.--The department and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall take all necessary steps to ensure that no identifying information regarding a specific insured or plan member is made available to the other department or the public when carrying out the requirements of this chapter.§ 4207. Regulations.The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this chapter.§ 4208. Expenses.All expenses incurred in carrying out the collection, review and reporting activities under this chapter, including the expenses of the department and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs regarding employees and any other professionals or specialists retained in connection with these activities, shall be charged to and paid by the insurer that is the subject of the collection, review or reporting.Section 2. All acts or parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 42.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0905PN1023 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021